Illinois, session 104th, HB4155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Nurse Agency Licensing Act is amended by 5changing Section 14 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 510/14)  (from Ch. 111, par. 964)7    Sec. 14. Minimum Standards. 8    (a) The Department, by rule, shall establish minimum 9standards for the operation of nurse agencies. Those standards 10shall include, but are not limited to: 11        (1) the maintenance of written policies and 12    procedures;13        (2) the maintenance and submission to the Department 14    of copies of all contracts between the nurse agency and 15    health care facility to which it assigns or refers nurses 16    or certified nurse aides and copies of all invoices to 17    health care facilities personnel. Executed contracts must 18    be sent to the Department within 5 business days of their 19    effective date; and 20        (3) the development of personnel policies for nurses 21    or certified nurse aides employed, assigned, or referred 22    to health care facilities, including a personal interview, 23    a reference check, an annual evaluation of each employee   HB4155- 2 -LRB104 15582 AAS 28749 b1    (which may be based in part upon information provided by 2    health care facilities utilizing nurse agency personnel), 3    and periodic health examinations. Executed contracts must 4    be sent to the Department within 5 business days of their 5    effective date and are not subject to disclosure under the 6    Freedom of Information Act. 7        No less than 100% of the nurse or certified nurse aide 8    hourly rate shall be paid to the nurse or certified nurse 9    aide employee. 10    (b) Each nurse agency shall have a nurse serving as a 11manager or supervisor of all nurses and certified nurses 12aides.13    (c) Each nurse agency shall ensure that its employees meet 14the minimum licensing, training, continuing education, and 15orientation standards for which those employees are licensed 16or certified. 17    (d) A nurse agency shall not employ, assign, or refer for 18use in an Illinois health care facility a nurse or certified 19nurse aide unless certified or licensed under applicable 20provisions of State and federal law or regulations. Each 21certified nurse aide shall comply with all pertinent 22regulations of the Illinois Department of Public Health 23relating to the health and other qualifications of personnel 24employed in health care facilities.25    (e) The Department may adopt rules to monitor the usage of 26nurse agency services to determine their impact.   HB4155- 3 -LRB104 15582 AAS 28749 b1    (f) Nurse agencies are prohibited from recruiting 2potential employees on the premises of a health care facility 3or requiring, as a condition of employment, assignment, or 4referral, that their employees recruit new employees for the 5nurse agency from among the permanent employees of the health 6care facility to which the nurse agency employees have been 7employed, assigned, or referred, and the health care facility 8to which such employees are employed, assigned, or referred is 9prohibited from requiring, as a condition of employment, that 10their employees recruit new employees from these nurse agency 11employees. Violation of this provision is a business offense. 12    (g) Nurse agencies are prohibited from entering into 13covenants not to compete with nurses and certified nurse aides 14if the nurse is employed, assigned, or referred by a nurse 15agency to a health care facility on a temporary basis or the 16certified nurse aide is employed, assigned, or referred by a 17nurse agency to a health care facility on a temporary basis. A 18covenant not to compete entered into on or after July 1, 2022 19(the effective date of Public Act 102-946) between a nurse 20agency and a nurse or a certified nurse aide is illegal and 21void if (i) the nurse is employed, assigned, or referred by a 22nurse agency to a health care facility on a temporary basis or 23(ii) the certified nurse aide is employed, assigned, or 24referred by a nurse agency to a health care facility on a 25temporary basis. In any contract on a temporary basis with any 26nurse, certified nurse aide, or health care facility, a nurse   HB4155- 4 -LRB104 15582 AAS 28749 b1agency is prohibited from requiring the payment of liquidated 2damages, conversion fees, employment fees, buy-out fees, 3placement fees, or other compensation if the nurse or 4certified nurse aide is hired as a permanent employee of a 5health care facility.6    (g-5) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 7Act of the 102nd General Assembly and ending on December 31, 82027, a nurse agency may enter into a covenant not to compete 9with a nurse or a certified nurse aide if (i) the nurse is 10employed, assigned, or referred by a nurse agency to a health 11care facility on a long-term basis or (ii) the certified nurse 12aide is employed, assigned, or referred by a nurse agency to a 13health care facility on a long-term basis. However, if a 14covenant not to compete that was entered into on or before 15December 31, 2027 expires on or after January 1, 2028, the 16covenant not to compete shall remain in effect until its 17expiration date. To be enforceable, the term of a covenant not 18to compete entered into under this subsection must be 19concurrent with the term of the initial employment, 20assignment, or referral of the nurse or certified nurse aide 21to a health care facility. A contract on a long-term basis 22between any nurse, certified nurse aide, or health care 23facility and a nurse agency may provide for the payment of 24actual damages, conversion fees, employment fees, buy-out 25fees, placement fees, or other reasonable expenses resulting 26from a violation of the contract that occurred during the   HB4155- 5 -LRB104 15582 AAS 28749 b1initial employment, assignment, or referral term. 2    (g-10) Notwithstanding subsections (g) and (g-5), 3beginning on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 4104th General Assembly, a nurse agency may negotiate and 5charge a finder's fee to a health care facility if the health 6care facility hires a nurse or a certified nurse aide and the 7nurse or certified nurse aide was employed, assigned, or 8referred by the nurse agency to the health care facility on 9either a temporary or long-term basis. 10    (h) A nurse agency shall submit a report quarterly to the 11Department for each health care entity with whom the agency 12contracts that includes all of the following by provider type 13and county in which the work was performed:14        (1) A list of the average amount charged to the health 15    care facility for each individual employee category.16        (2) A list of the average amount paid by the agency to 17    employees in each individual employee category.18        (3) A list of the average amount of labor-related 19    costs paid by the agency for each employee category, 20    including payroll taxes, workers' compensation insurance, 21    professional liability coverage, credentialing and 22    testing, and other employee related costs. 23    The Department shall publish by county in which the work 24was performed the average amount charged to the health care 25facilities by nurse agencies for each individual worker 26category and the average amount paid by the agency to each   HB4155- 6 -LRB104 15582 AAS 28749 b1individual worker category. 2    (i) The Department shall publish on its website the 3reports yearly by county.4    (j) The Department of Labor shall compel production of the 5maintained records, as required under this Section, by the 6nurse agencies. 7(Source: P.A. 102-946, eff. 7-1-22; 102-1124, eff. 2-3-23.)